Louisiana, session 2026, HB619.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:94(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§94. Budget Stabilization Fund
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including R.S.
49:327, the state treasurer is authorized to invest an aggregate of up to five percent
of the fund's balance in precious metals and in digital assets having a market
capitalization exceeding seven hundred fifty billion dollars averaged over the
previous calendar year.
(2) Assets acquired pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection shall be
held in any of the following ways:
(a) On behalf of the state by a qualified custodian.
(b) As an exchange-traded product.
(c) Digital assets may be held by the state treasurer through a secure-custody
solution.
(d) Precious metals may be held by the state in physical form.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-30 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 619
(3) For purposes of this Subsection, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(a) "Digital assets" means an asset that exists only in digital form and that
confers economic, proprietary, or access rights. The term shall include but not be
limited to virtual currency, cryptocurrency, and other natively electronic assets.
(b) "Exchange-traded product" means a security or financial instrument that
meets all of the following criteria:
(i) Is approved by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission,
the United States Commodity Futures Trading Commission, or other appropriate
federal or state regulatory authority.
(ii) Is traded on a regulated exchange in the United States.
(iii) Derives its value from an underlying pool of assets such as stocks,
bonds, commodities, or indices.
(c) "Precious metal" means gold, silver, or platinum, whether in coin,
bullion, or another tangible form.
(d) "Private key" means a unique element of cryptographic data that is
known only to the owner and is used to authorize or sign transactions on a
blockchain or distributed ledger.
(e) "Qualified custodian" means any of the following:
(i) A company possessing a license granted by the state that sells digital
assets to customers and offers custody services for those assets.
(ii) Any federal- or state-chartered bank, trust company, or special purpose
depositor institution that is licensed or authorized to sell digital assets or offer
custody services for those assets.
(f) "Secure custody solution" means a secure technological product or
service, or combination thereof, for holding digital assets that meets all of the
following criteria:
(i) Ensures that any private key securing the digital asset is known
exclusively to and is accessible only by its owner; maintained in encrypted form; and
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-30 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 619
not stored on or accessible by a standard internet-connected device, such as a mobile
phone.
(ii) Utilizes robust access controls and multi-party authorization protocols
for transactions and maintains an auditable log of all actions initiated by users.
(iii) Employs a disaster-recovery and continuity protocol that ensures the
state's access to the assets in the event the custody service provider becomes
unavailable.
(iv) Undergoes regular, independent, security audits and penetration testing,
with any identified vulnerabilities promptly remedied.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article VII, Section 14(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the
Act which originated as House Bill No. __ of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature
is adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.